Wyoming statutes. Title 17 Corporations, Partnerships and Associations
B. Amendment of Bylaws

§ 17-16-1020.
Amendment by board of directors or shareholders.

A corporation’s shareholders may amend or repeal the corporation’s bylaws.

A corporation’s board of directors may amend or repeal the corporation’s bylaws unless:

The articles of incorporation, W.S.

17-16-1021

or if applicable W.S.

17-16-1022

reserve this power exclusively to the shareholders in whole or part; or

The shareholders in amending, repealing or adopting a bylaw provide expressly that the board of directors may not amend, repeal or reinstate that bylaw.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 249, § 1; 2009, ch. 115, § 2.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, deleted “even though the bylaws may also be amended or repealed by its board of directors” at the end of (a); substituted “W.S.

17-16-1021

or if applicable W.S.

17-16-1022

” for “or this act” in (b)(i); in (b)(ii), substituted “repealing or adopting a” for “or repealing a particular,” and added “or reinstate”; and made related changes.

Editor's note. —

The subsections in this section have been renumbered to align with the Model Business Corporations Act as amended through December, 2007, in accordance with 2009 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 115, § 4.

Meaning of “this act.” —

See note under same catchline following §

17-16-101

.

Stated

in

Croonberg v. Estate of Croonberg, 988 P.2d 41,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 152

(Wyo. 1999).

§ 17-16-1021.
Bylaw increasing quorum or voting requirement for directors.

A bylaw that increases a quorum or voting requirement for the board of directors may be amended or repealed:

If originally adopted by the shareholders, only by the shareholders, unless the bylaw otherwise provides;

If adopted by the board of directors, either by the shareholders or by the board of directors.

A bylaw adopted or amended by the shareholders that increases a quorum or voting requirement for the board of directors may provide that it may be amended or repealed only by a specified vote of either the shareholders or the board of directors.

Action by the board of directors under subsection (a) of this section to amend or repeal a bylaw that changes the quorum or voting requirement for the board of directors shall meet the same quorum requirement and be adopted by the same vote required to take action under the quorum and voting requirement then in effect or proposed to be adopted, whichever is greater.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 249, § 1; 2009, ch. 115, § 2.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, substituted “increases a” for “fixes a greater” in the introductory language of (a) and in (b); added “unless the bylaw otherwise provides” in (a)(i); deleted “originally” after “If” in (a)(ii); and in (c), substituted “subsection (a) of this section to amend or repeal” for “paragraph (a)(ii) of this section to adopt or amend,” and added “or proposed to be adopted, whichever is greater”.

Editor's note. —

This section has been renumbered to align with the Model Business Corporations Act as amended through December, 2007, in accordance with 2009 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 115, § 4.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Validity, construction and effect of provision in charter or bylaw requiring supermajority vote, 80 ALR4th 667.

§ 17-16-1022.
Bylaw provisions relating to the election of directors.

Unless the articles of incorporation specifically prohibit the adoption of a bylaw pursuant to this section, alter the vote specified in W.S. 17-16-728(a) or provide for cumulative voting, a public corporation may elect in its bylaws to be governed in the election of directors as follows:

Each vote entitled to be cast may be voted for or against up to that number of candidates that is equal to the number of directors to be elected, or a shareholder may indicate an abstention, but without cumulating the votes;

To be elected, a nominee shall have received a plurality of the votes cast by holders of shares entitled to vote in the election at a meeting at which a quorum is present, provided that a nominee who is elected but receives more votes against than for election shall serve as a director for a term that shall terminate on the date that is the earlier of ninety (90) days from the date on which the voting results are determined pursuant to W.S. 17-16-729(b)(v) or is the date on which an individual is selected by the board of directors to fill the office held by such director, which selection shall be deemed to constitute the filling of a vacancy by the board to which W.S.

17-16-810

applies. Subject to paragraph (iii) of this subsection, a nominee who is elected but receives more votes against than for election shall not serve as a director beyond the ninety (90) day period referenced above; and

The board of directors may select any qualified individual to fill the office held by a director who received more votes against than for election.

Subsection (a) of this section does not apply to an election of directors by a voting group if at the expiration of the time fixed under a provision requiring advance notification of director candidates, or absent such a provision, at a time fixed by the board of directors which is not more than fourteen (14) days before notice is given of the meeting at which the election is to occur, there are more candidates for election by the voting group than the number of directors to be elected, one (1) or more of whom are properly proposed by shareholders. An individual shall not be considered a candidate for purposes of this subsection if the board of directors determines before the notice of meeting is given that such individual’s candidacy does not create a bona fide election contest.

A bylaw electing to be governed by this section may be repealed:

If originally adopted by the shareholders, only by the shareholders, unless the bylaw otherwise provides; or

If adopted by the board of directors, by the board of directors or the shareholders.

History.

Laws 2009, ch. 115, § 1.

Editor's note. —

This section has been renumbered to align with the Model Business Corporations Act as amended through December, 2007, in accordance with 2009 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 115, § 4.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2009, ch. 115, § 5, makes the act effective July 1, 2009.